North Dakota, session 69, SB2341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 15.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Interstate compact for school psychologists.
The interstate compact for school psychologists is entered with all states legally joining the
compact, in the form substantially as follows:
ARTICLE I - PURPOSE
1. The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the interstate practice of school psychology
in educational or school settings, and in so doing to improve the availability of school
psychological services to the public. This compact is intended to establish a pathway
to allow school psychologists to obtain equivalent licenses to provide school
psychological services in any member state. In this way, this compact shall enable the
member states to ensure that safe and effective school psychological services are
available and delivered by appropriately qualified professionals in their educational
settings.
2. To facilitate the objectives described above, this compact:
a. Enables school psychologists who qualify for receipt of an equivalent license to
practice in other member states without first satisfying burdensome and
duplicative requirements;
b. Promotes the mobility of school psychologists between and among the member
states in order to address workforce shortages and to ensure safe and reliable
school psychological services are available in each member state;
Page No. 1 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Enhances the public accessibility of school psychological services by increasing
the availability of qualified, licensed school psychologists through the
establishment of an efficient and streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in
other member states;
d. Preserves and respects the authority of each member state to protect the health
and safety of its residents by ensuring only qualified, licensed professionals are
authorized to provide school psychological services within that state;
e. Requires school psychologists practicing within a member state to comply with
the scope of practice laws present in the state where the school psychological
services are being provided;
f. Promotes cooperation between the member states in regulating the practice of
school psychology within those states; and
g. Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses who are licensed
to provide school psychological services.
ARTICLE II - DEFINITIONS
1. "Active military member" means any person with full-time duty status in the armed
forces of the United States, including members of the national guard and reserve.
2. "Adverse action" means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a license by a
state licensing authority.
3. "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary, prosecutorial diversion, monitoring, or
practice remediation process entered in lieu of an adverse action which is applicable
to a school psychologist and approved by the state licensing authority of a member
state in which the participating school psychologist is licensed. This includes programs
to which licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues may be referred in lieu of
an adverse action.
4. "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a member state to serve as the
representative to the commission for that member state.
5. "Compact" means the school psychologist interstate licensure compact.
6. "Continuing professional education" means a requirement imposed by a member state
as a condition of license renewal to provide evidence of successful participation in
Page No. 2 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
professional educational activities relevant to the provision of school psychological
services.
7. "Criminal background check" means the submission of fingerprints or other biometric
information for a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining the applicant's criminal
history record information, as defined in 28 CFR 20.3(d), and the state's criminal
history record repository, as defined in 28 CFR 20.3(f).
8. "Doctoral-level degree" means a graduate degree program consisting of at least ninety
graduate semester hours in the field of school psychology including a supervised
internship.
9. "Encumbered license" means a license a state licensing authority has limited in any
way other than through an alternative program, including temporary or provisional
licenses.
10. "Equivalent license" means a license to practice school psychology which a member
state has identified as a license that may be provided to school psychologists from
other member states pursuant to the compact.
11. "Executive committee" means the commission's chair, vice chair, secretary, and
treasurer and any other commissioners as may be determined by commission rule or
bylaw.
12. "Home state" means the member state that issued the home state license to the
licensee and is the licensee's primary state of practice.
13. "Home state license" means the license that is not an encumbered license issued by
the home state to provide school psychological services.
14. "License" means a current license, certification, or other authorization granted by a
member state's licensing authority that permits an individual to provide school
psychological services.
15. "Licensee" means an individual who holds a license from a member state to provide
school psychological services.
16. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact and been admitted to the
commission under the provisions herein and commission rules.
Page No. 3 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
17. "Model compact" means the model language for the school psychologist interstate
licensure compact on file with the council of state governments or other entity as
designated by the commission.
18. "Practice of school psychology" means the delivery of school psychological services.
19. "Qualifying national examination" means a national licensing examination endorsed by
the national association of school psychologists and any other examination as
approved by the rules of the commission.
20. "Qualifying school psychologist education program" means an education program that
awards a specialist-level or doctoral-level degree or equivalent upon completion and is
approved by the rules of the commission as meeting the necessary minimum
educational standards to ensure that its graduates are ready, qualified, and able to
engage in the practice of school psychology.
21. "Remote state" means a member state other than the home state where a licensee
holds a license through the compact.
22. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity, including the commission and the
state licensing authority of each member state, which has the force of law.
23. "School psychological services" means academic, mental and behavioral health
services including assessment, prevention, consultation and collaboration,
intervention, and evaluation provided by a school psychologist in a school, as outlined
in applicable professional standards as determined by commission rule.
24. "School psychologist" means an individual who has met the requirements to obtain a
home state license that legally conveys the professional title of school psychologist, or
its equivalent as determined by the rules of the commission.
25. "School psychologist interstate licensure compact commission" or "commission"
means the joint government agency established by this compact whose membership
consists of representatives from each member state that has enacted the compact, as
described in article VII .
26. "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes a school
psychologist licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in the state and the
circumstances under which the licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures,
actions, and processes. The procedures, actions, and processes, and the
Page No. 4 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
circumstances under which they may be undertaken, may be established through
means, including statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the
state licensing authority or other government agency.
27. "Specialist-level degree" means a degree program requiring at least sixty graduate
semester hours or equivalent in the field of school psychology, including a supervised
internship.
28. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of
America.
29. "State licensing authority" means a member state's regulatory body responsible for
issuing licenses or otherwise overseeing the practice of school psychology.
30. "State-specific requirement" means a requirement for licensure covered in coursework
or examination, including content of unique interest to the state.
31. "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee to engage in the
full and unrestricted practice of school psychology.
ARTICLE III - STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
1. To be eligible to join this compact, and to maintain eligibility as a member state, a state
must:
a. Enact a compact statute that is not materially different from the model compact
as defined in the commission's rules;
b. Participate in the sharing of information with other member states as reasonably
necessary to accomplish the objectives of this compact, and as further defined in
article VIII ;
c. Identify and maintain with the commission a list of equivalent licenses available to
licensees who hold a home state license under this compact;
d. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
licensees;
e. Notify the commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and the
commission's rules, of any adverse action taken against a licensee, or of the
availability of investigative information which relates to a licensee or applicant for
licensure;
f. Require that applicants for a home state license have;
Page No. 5 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) Taken and passed a qualifying national examination as defined by the rules
of the commission;
(2) Completed a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of supervised
internship, of which at least six hundred must have been completed in a
school, prior to being approved for licensure;
(3) Graduated from a qualifying school psychologist education program;
g. Comply with the terms of the compact and the rules of the commission.
2. Each member state shall grant an equivalent license to practice school psychology in
the state upon application by a licensee who satisfies the criteria of subdivision a o f
subsection 1 of article IV. Each member state shall grant renewal of the equivalen t
license to a licensee who satisfies the criteria of subdivision b of subsection 1 o f
article IV .
3. A member state may set and collect a fee for granting an equivalent license.
ARTICLE IV - SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
1. To obtain and maintain an equivalent license from a remote state under the compact, a
licensee must:
a. Hold and maintain an active home state license;
b. Satisfy any applicable state specific requirements established by the member
state after an equivalent license is granted;
c. Complete any administrative or application requirements that the commission
may establish by rule, and pay any associated fees;
d. Complete any requirements for renewal in the home state, including applicable
continuing professional education requirements; and
e. Upon the licensee's application to receive a license under this compact, undergo
a criminal background check in the member state in which the equivalent license
is sought under the laws and regulations of the member state.
2. To renew an equivalent license in a member state other than the home state, a
licensee shall apply for renewal, complete a background check, and pay renewal fees
as determined by the licensing authority.
ARTICLE V - ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
Page No. 6 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
A licensee who is an active military member or is the spouse of an active military member
shall be deemed to hold a home state license in any of the following locations:
1. The licensee's permanent residence;
2. A member state that is the licensee's primary state of practice;
3. A member state where the licensee has relocated pursuant to a permanent change of
station.
ARTICLE VI - DISCIPLINE - ADVERSE ACTIONS
1. Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to limit the authority of a
member state to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on licensees according
to the state practice laws of the member state.
2. Member states may receive and shall provide files and information regarding the
investigation and discipline, if any, of licensees in other member states upon request.
A member state receiving such information or files shall protect and maintain the
security and confidentiality of the information or files, in at least the same manner the
member state maintains its own investigatory or disciplinary files and information.
Before disclosing any disciplinary or investigatory information received from another
member state, the disclosing state shall communicate its intention and purpose for the
disclosure to the member state that originally provided the information.
ARTICLE VII - ESTABLISHMENT OF THE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST
INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
1. The member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose
membership consists of all member states that have enacted the compact, and the
agency is known as the school psychologist interstate licensure compact commission.
The commission is an instrumentality of the member states acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one state. The commission shall come into existence on or after
the effective date of the compact as set forth in article XI .
2. Membership, voting, and meetings.
a. Each member state must have and be limited to one delegate selected by the
member state's state licensing authority.
Page No. 7 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. The delegate must be the primary administrative officer of the member state
licensing authority or the officer's designee who is an employee of the member
state licensing authority.
c. The commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates and
may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
d. The commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate from
office.
e. A member state's licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate
occurring on the commission within sixty days of the vacancy.
f. Each delegate must be entitled to one vote on all matters before the commission
requiring a vote by commission delegates.
g. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the
bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by telecommunication,
videoconference, or other means of communication.
h. The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The commission may meet by
telecommunication, videoconference, or other similar electronic means.
3. The commission shall:
a. Establish the fiscal year of the commission;
b. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
c. Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
d. Establish the procedure through which a licensee may change the licensee's
home state;
e. Maintain the commission's financial records under the bylaws;
f. Meet and take actions consistent with the provisions of this compact, the
commission's rules, and the bylaws;
g. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission,
provided the standing of any member state licensing authority to sue or be sued
under applicable law may not be affected;
Page No. 8 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
h. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as the
authenticated business records of the commission, and designate an agent to do
so on the commission's behalf;
i. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
j. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including employees of a
member state;
k. Conduct an annual financial review;
l. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant
the individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact,
and establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel
matters;
m. Assess and collect fees;
n. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources of
revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, use, and
dispose of the same; provided at all times the commission avoids any
appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
o. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal,
or mixed, or any undivided interest in the property;
p. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose
of any property, real, personal, or mixed;
q. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
r. Borrow money;
s. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in the
compact and the bylaws;
t. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
u. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice chair;
Page No. 9 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
v. Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the
model compact language such that the state would not qualify for participation in
the compact; and
w. Perform other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this compact.
4. The executive committee.
a. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission
according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of
the executive committee shall include:
(1) Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact,
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the compact,
its rules and bylaws, and other duties as deemed necessary;
(2) Recommend to the commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to
this compact legislation, fees charged to member states, fees charged to
licensees, and other fees;
(3) Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract;
(4) Prepare and recommend the budget;
(5) Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission;
(6) Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance
reports to the commission;
(7) Establish additional committees as necessary;
(8) Exercise the powers and duties of the commission during the interim
between commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules,
adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties
expressly reserved to the commission by rule or bylaw; and
(9) Other duties under the rules or bylaws of the commission.
b. The executive committee is composed of up to seven members:
(1) The chair and vice chair of the commission are voting members of the
executive committee; and
Page No. 10 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) The commission shall elect five voting members from the current
membership of the commission.
c. The commission may remove any member of the executive committee under the
commission's bylaws.
d. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
(1) Executive committee meetings must be open to the public, except that the
executive committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided
in subdivision b of subsection 6 .
(2) The executive committee shall give a thirty-day notice of its meetings,
posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to persons with
an interest in the business of the commission.
(3) The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with
paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 6 .
5. The commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
6. Meetings of the commission.
a. All meetings must be open to the public, except the commission may meet in a
closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in subdivision b .
(1) Public notice for all meetings of the full commission must be given in the
same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in article IX ,
except the commission may hold a special meeting as provided in
paragraph 2 .
(2) The commission may hold a special meeting if the commission must meet to
conduct emergency business by giving a forty-eight-hour notice to all
commissioners, on the commission's website, and by other means as
provided in the commission's rules. The commission's legal counsel shall
certify the commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
b. The commission or the executive committee or other committees of the
commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the commission or
executive committee or other committees of the commission to receive legal
advice or to discuss:
Page No. 11 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) Noncompliance of a member state with the state's obligations under the
compact;
(2) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices, or
procedures related to specific employees;
(3) Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the commission or by a
member state's licensing authority;
(4) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(5) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services,
or real estate;
(6) Accusing a person of a crime or formally censuring a person;
(7) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
confidential;
(8) Information of a personal nature if disclosure would constitute a clearly
unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(9) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
(10) Information related to a investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or
for use of the commission or other committee charged with responsibility of
investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the
compact;
(11) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state
law; or
(12) Other matters as promulgated by the commission by rule.
c. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state the
meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and the
reference must be recorded in the minutes.
d. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters
discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions
taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action must be identified in the
minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting must remain under seal,
Page No. 12 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
subject to release only by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of
competent jurisdiction.
7. Financing of the commission.
a. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
b. The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as
provided in subdivision n of subsection 3 .
c. The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
member state and impose fees on licensees practicing in the member states
under an equivalent license to cover the cost of the operations and activities of
the commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover
the commission's annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
member states must be allocated based upon a formula the commission shall
promulgate by rule.
d. The commission may not incur obligations of any kind before securing the funds
adequate to meet the obligations; nor may the commission pledge the credit of
any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
e. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements.
The receipts and disbursements of the commission must be subject to the
financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.
However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission are
subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant,
and the report of the financial review must be included in and become part of the
annual report of the commission.
8. Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
a. The members, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of the
commission are immune from suit and liability, both personally and in the
individual's official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or
personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the
Page No. 13 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided nothing in this
paragraph may be construed to protect the individual from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of the individual. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
commission may not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
b. The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee,
and representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose
liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as
determined by the commission that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided nothing herein may be
construed to prohibit the individual from retaining counsel at the individual's own
expense; and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did
not result from the individual's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
c. The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the commission for the
amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the individual had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of the individual.
d. Nothing in this compact may be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which must be governed
solely by any other applicable state laws.
e. Nothing in this compact may be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a
member state's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with
Page No. 14 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state
or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
f. Nothing in this compact may be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity
by the member states or by the commission.
ARTICLE VIII - FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE
1. The commission shall provide for facilitating the exchange of information to administer
and implement the provisions of this compact in accordance with the rules of the
commission, consistent with generally accepted data protection principles.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall
agree to provide for the facilitation of the following licensee information as required by
the rules of the commission, including:
a. Identifying information;
b. Licensure data;
c. Adverse actions against a license and information related to the actions;
d. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the
beginning and ending dates of the participation, and other information related to
the participation not made confidential under member state law;
e. Any denial of application for licensure, and reason for the denial;
f. The presence of investigative information; and
g. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or the
protection of the public under the rules of the commission.
3. Nothing in this compact may be deemed or construed to alter, limit, or inhibit the power
of a member state to control and maintain ownership of the state's licensee
information or alter, limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations governing licensee
information in the member state.
ARTICLE IX - RULEMAKING
1. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth
in this interstate compact and the rules adopted under the compact. Rules and
amendments are binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.
2. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules to achieve the intent and purpose
of this interstate compact. If the commission exercises rulemaking authority in a
Page No. 15 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
manner beyond the purpose and intent of the interstate compact, or the powers
granted under the compact, then the action by the commission is invalid and has no
force and effect of law in the member states.
3. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by enactment of a
statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four years
of the date of adoption of the rule, then the rule has no further force and effect in any
member state.
4. Rules or amendments to the rules must be adopted or ratified at a regular or special
meeting of the commission in accordance with commission rules and bylaws.
5. Before promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at
least thirty days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and
voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking on the website
of:
a. The commission or other publicly accessible platform; and
b. Each member state licensing authority or other publicly accessible platform or the
publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.
6. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with a forty-eight-hour notice, with opportunity to comment,
provided the usual rulemaking procedures are retroactively applied to the rule as soon
as reasonably possible, no later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule.
For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted
immediately in order to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;
c. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established
by federal law or rule; or
d. Protect public health and safety.
ARTICLE X - OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
1. Oversight.
Page No. 16 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. The executive and judicial branches of the state government in each member
state shall enforce the compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to
implement the compact.
b. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission must be
brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue
and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing in the compact affects or
limits the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for
professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
c. The commission may receive service of process in any proceeding regarding the
enforcement or interpretation of the compact and has standing to intervene in the
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the commission service of process
renders a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or
promulgated rules.
2. Default, technical assistance, and termination.
a. If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the
promulgated rules, the commission must provide written notice to the defaulting
state. The notice of default must describe the default, the proposed means of
curing the default, and any other action the commission may take, and must offer
training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
b. The commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other member
states.
3. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a supermajority of the delegates of the
member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that state by this
compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default
does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the
period of default.
Page No. 17 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. Termination of membership in the compact may be imposed after all other means of
securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate
must be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of
the defaulting state's legislature, the defaulting state's licensing authority, and each of
the member state's licensing authorities.
5. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that
extend beyond the effective date of termination.
6. Upon the termination of a state's membership from this compact, the state
immediately shall provide notice to all licensees within the state of the termination. The
terminated state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
compact for a minimum of six months after the date of the notice of termination.
7. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in
default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing
between the commission and the defaulting state.
8. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United
States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party must be awarded all costs of
the litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
9. Dispute resolution.
a. Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve
disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between
member and nonmember states.
b. The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
10. Enforcement.
a. By majority vote as provided by rule, the commission may initiate legal action
against a member state in default in the United States district court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices
to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated
rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
Page No. 18 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party must be awarded al l
costs of the litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein
may not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may
pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting member
state's law.
b. A member state may initiate legal action against the commission in the United
States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of
the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party must be awarded all costs of the litigation, including reasonable
attorney's fees.
c. A person other than a member state may not enforce this compact against the
commission.
ARTICLE XI - EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
1. The compact is effective on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law
in the seventh member state.
a. On or after the effective date of the compact under subsection 1, the commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to
determine whether the statute enacted by each charter member state is
materially different than the model compact statute.
(1) Charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different
from the model compact statute must be entitled to the default process set
forth in article X .
(2) If any member state later is found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the compact, the commission must remain in existence and
the compact must remain in effect even if the number of member states is
less than seven.
b. A member state enacting the compact subsequent to the charter member states
is subject to the process under subdivision v of subsection 3 of article VII to
Page No. 19 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
determine if the enactment is materially different from the model compact statute
and whether the member state qualifies for participation in the compact.
c. All actions taken for the benefit of the commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the compact before the effective date of the
compact or the commission coming into existence are considered to be actions of
the commission unless specifically repudiated by the commission.
(1) Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission's initial
adoption of the rules and bylaws is subject to the rules and bylaws as they
exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule
that has previously been adopted by the commission has the full force and
effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.
(2) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing the same.
2. A member state's withdrawal may not take effect until one hundred eighty days after
enactment of the repealing statute.
3. Withdrawal may not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's
licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting
requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
4. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state shall
immediately provide notice of the withdrawal to all licensees within that state.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, the withdrawing
state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a
minimum of six months after the date of the notice of withdrawal.
a. Nothing contained in the compact may be construed to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state
and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.
b. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to the
compact may become effective and binding upon any member state until it is
enacted into the laws of all member states.
ARTICLE XII - CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
Page No. 20 25.0984.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. This compact and the commission's rulemaking authority must be liberally construed
so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of the
compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or requiring the
promulgation of rules may not be construed to limit the commission's rulemaking
authority solely for those purposes.
2. The provisions of this compact are severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or
provision of the compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to
the constitution of any member state, a state seeking participation in the compact, or
of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or
circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability of the compact to any
other government, agency, person, or circumstance is not affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section, the commission may deny a state's
participation in the compact or, in accordance with the requirements of subsection 2 o f
article X, terminate a member state's participation in the compact, if the commission
determines a constitutional requirement of a member state is a material departure
from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact is held to be contrary to the constitution
of any member state, the compact must remain in full force and effect as to the
remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected
as to all severable matters.
ARTICLE XIII - CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
1. Nothing in this compact may prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a
member state that is consistent with the compact.
2. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in
conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
3. All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are
binding in accordance with the terms of the agreements.
Page No. 21 25.0984.01000